District of Columbia statutes.
47-2309

Fuel exported from District of Columbia exempted from taxation.

No tax on motor vehicle fuels exported or sold for exportation from the District of Columbia to any other jurisdiction or nation shall be imposed.

Apr. 23, 1924, 43 Stat. 106, ch. 131, § 9
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2309.
1973 Ed., § 47-1909.